Utah statutes.
57-27-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Contaminated" or "contamination" is as defined in Section 19-6-902.

(2)  "Decontaminated" or "decontamination" is as defined in Section 19-6-902.

(3) (a)  "Owner" means the holder of a legal or equitable title or interest in real property.

(b)  "Owner" includes a shareholder, partner, operator, or other legal entity.

(4)  "Real estate professional" means a licensee under Title 61, Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act.



Amended by Chapter 379, 2010 General Session

